test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jurmw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - jurmõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p_koirõ'
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Nom: jurmõ
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Nom: jurmõd
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Gen: jurma
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Gen: [jurmi, jurmije]
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Par: [jurma, jurmaa]
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Par: [jurmi, jurmitõ]
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Ill: [jurmaa, jurmasõ]
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Ill: [jurmi, jurmisõ]
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Ine: jurmõz
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Ine: jurmiz
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Ela: jurmõssõ
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Ela: jurmissõ
    jurmõ+N+Sg+All: jurmõllõ
    jurmõ+N+Pl+All: jurmillõ
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Ade: jurmõl
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Ade: jurmil
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Abl: jurmõltõ
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Abl: jurmiltõ
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Tra: jurmõssi
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Tra: jurmissi
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Ter: jurmassaa
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Ter: jurmissaa
    jurmõ+N+Sg+Com: jurmaka
    jurmõ+N+Pl+Com: jurmika
